Hawaii statutes.
§200-13 Marine inspections. (a) The
department shall:

(1) Develop a list of minimum requirements for the
marine inspection of vessels seeking permits to moor in state small boat
harbors;

(2) Approve qualified marine surveyors to inspect
vessels seeking permits to moor in state small boat harbors; and

(3) Approve a fee schedule for marine surveyors'
inspections.

(b) Vessels failing the marine inspection for
a permit or a permit renewal shall have thirty days to correct deficiencies and
complete the inspection.

(c) Owners of vessels that fail the marine
inspection may contest the inspection before an arbitration board of three
inspectors approved by the department. The inspector who performed the
original inspection shall not be a member of the arbitration board. [L 1991, c
272, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 113, §1]

Cross References

Alien aquatic organisms, see §187A-32(b).

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next